Illinois, session 104th, HB3944.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. Appropriates $4,500,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, from the Supreme Court Historic Preservation 6Fund to the Supreme Court Historic Preservation Commission for 7Historic Preservation Purposes. 8    Section 10. Appropriates $900,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, from the General Revenue Fund to the Supreme 10Court Historic Preservation Commission for deposit into the 11Supreme Court Historic Preservation Fund. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132025.